Maryland, session 2025, HB1420.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Estates and Trusts
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1420*

HOUSE BILL 1420
2–216.
EACH REGISTER, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND REGISTERS OF
WILLS ASSOCIATION, SHALL OFFER A METHOD BY WHICH AN INDIVIDUAL WITHOUT
GOVERNMENT–ISSUED IDENTIFICATION MAY PROVE THE INDIVIDUAL’S IDENTITY AS
AN HEIR OR A BENEFICIARY OF A WILL.
5–105.
(a) (1) In this section, “serious crime” means a crime that reflects adversely on
an individual’s honesty, trustworthiness, or fitness to perform the duties of a personal
representative.
(2) “Serious crime” includes fraud, extortion, embezzlement, forgery,
perjury, and theft.
(b) Subject to § 5–104 of this subtitle, the register or court may grant letters to:
(1) A trust company;
(2) Any other corporation authorized by law to be a personal
representative; or
(3) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, any individual.
(c) Letters may not be granted to a person who, at the time a determination of
priority is made, has filed with the register a declaration in writing that the person
renounces the right to administer or is:
(1) Under the age of 18 years;
(2) Mentally incompetent;
(3) Convicted of a serious crime, unless the person shows good cause for the
granting of letters;
[(4) Not a citizen of the United States unless the person is a permanent
resident of the United States and is:
(i) The spouse of the decedent;
(ii) An ancestor of the decedent;
(iii) A descendant of the decedent; or
(iv) A sibling of the decedent;]

HOUSE BILL 1420 3
[(5)] (4) A full–time judge of a court established under the laws of
Maryland or the United States including a judge of an orphans’ or probate court, or a clerk
of court, or a register, unless the person is the surviving spouse or is related to the decedent
within the third degree; or
[(6)] (5) A nonresident of the State, unless there shall be on file with the
register an irrevocable designation by the nonresident of an appropriate person who resides
in the State on whom service of process may be made in the same manner and with the
effect as if it were served personally in the State on the nonresident.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.